SpellChecker/bash.aff
FLAG long
SFX O37 0 өләйҙәр .	+PxSg3+Der/дай+Pl
SFX O37 0 өбөҙҙәйҙәр .	+PxPl1+Der/дай+Pl
SFX O37 0 өгөҙҙәйҙәр .	+PxPl2+Der/дай+Pl
SFX O37 0 өмсәләр .	+PxSg1+Der/са+Pl
SFX O37 0 өңсәләр .	+PxSg2+Der/са+Pl
SFX O37 0 өсәләр .	+PxSg3+Der/са+Pl
SFX O37 0 өбөҙсәләр .	+PxPl1+Der/са+Pl
SFX O37 0 өгөҙсәләр .	+PxPl2+Der/са+Pl
SFX O37 0 өмдәйҙәрҙең .	+PxSg1+Der/дай+Pl+Gen
SFX O37 0 өңдәйҙәрҙең .	+PxSg2+Der/дай+Pl+Gen
SFX O37 0 өләйҙәрҙең .	+PxSg3+Der/дай+Pl+Gen
SFX O37 0 өбөҙҙәйҙәрҙең .	+PxPl1+Der/дай+Pl+Gen
SFX O37 0 өгөҙҙәйҙәрҙең .	+PxPl2+Der/дай+Pl+Gen
SFX O37 0 өмдәйҙәргә .	+PxSg1+Der/дай+Pl+Dat
SFX O37 0 өңдәйҙәргә .	+PxSg2+Der/дай+Pl+Dat
SFX O37 0 өләйҙәргә .	+PxSg3+Der/дай+Pl+Dat
SFX O37 0 өбөҙҙәйҙәргә .	+PxPl1+Der/дай+Pl+Dat
SFX O37 0 өгөҙҙәйҙәргә .	+PxPl2+Der/дай+Pl+Dat
SFX O37 0 өмдәйҙәрҙе .	+PxSg1+Der/дай+Pl+Acc
SFX O37 0 өңдәйҙәрҙе .	+PxSg2+Der/дай+Pl+Acc
SFX O37 0 өләйҙәрҙе .	+PxSg3+Der/дай+Pl+Acc
SFX O37 0 өбөҙҙәйҙәрҙе .	+PxPl1+Der/дай+Pl+Acc
SFX O37 0 өгөҙҙәйҙәрҙе .	+PxPl2+Der/дай+Pl+Acc
SFX O37 0 өмдәйҙәрҙән .	+PxSg1+Der/дай+Pl+Abl
SFX O37 0 өңдәйҙәрҙән .	+PxSg2+Der/дай+Pl+Abl
SFX O37 0 өләйҙәрҙән .	+PxSg3+Der/дай+Pl+Abl
SFX O37 0 өбөҙҙәйҙәрҙән .	+PxPl1+Der/дай+Pl+Abl
SFX O37 0 өгөҙҙәйҙәрҙән .	+PxPl2+Der/дай+Pl+Abl
SFX O37 0 өмдәйҙәрҙә .	+PxSg1+Der/дай+Pl+Loc
SFX O37 0 өңдәйҙәрҙә .	+PxSg2+Der/дай+Pl+Loc
SFX O37 0 өләйҙәрҙә .	+PxSg3+Der/дай+Pl+Loc
SFX O37 0 өбөҙҙәйҙәрҙә .	+PxPl1+Der/дай+Pl+Loc
SFX O37 0 өгөҙҙәйҙәрҙә .	+PxPl2+Der/дай+Pl+Loc
SFX O37 0 өмсәләрҙең .	+PxSg1+Der/са+Pl+Gen
SFX O37 0 өңсәләрҙең .	+PxSg2+Der/са+Pl+Gen
SFX O37 0 өсәләрҙең .	+PxSg3+Der/са+Pl+Gen
SFX O37 0 өбөҙсәләрҙең .	+PxPl1+Der/са+Pl+Gen
SFX O37 0 өгөҙсәләрҙең .	+PxPl2+Der/са+Pl+Gen
SFX O37 0 өмсәләргә .	+PxSg1+Der/са+Pl+Dat
SFX O37 0 өңсәләргә .	+PxSg2+Der/са+Pl+Dat
SFX O37 0 өсәләргә .	+PxSg3+Der/са+Pl+Dat
SFX O37 0 өбөҙсәләргә .	+PxPl1+Der/са+Pl+Dat
SFX O37 0 өгөҙсәләргә .	+PxPl2+Der/са+Pl+Dat
SFX O37 0 өмсәләрҙе .	+PxSg1+Der/са+Pl+Acc
SFX O37 0 өңсәләрҙе .	+PxSg2+Der/са+Pl+Acc
SFX O37 0 өсәләрҙе .	+PxSg3+Der/са+Pl+Acc
SFX O37 0 өбөҙсәләрҙе .	+PxPl1+Der/са+Pl+Acc
SFX O37 0 өгөҙсәләрҙе .	+PxPl2+Der/са+Pl+Acc
SFX O37 0 өмсәләрҙән .	+PxSg1+Der/са+Pl+Abl
SFX O37 0 өңсәләрҙән .	+PxSg2+Der/са+Pl+Abl
SFX O37 0 өсәләрҙән .	+PxSg3+Der/са+Pl+Abl
SFX O37 0 өбөҙсәләрҙән .	+PxPl1+Der/са+Pl+Abl
SFX O37 0 өгөҙсәләрҙән .	+PxPl2+Der/са+Pl+Abl
SFX O37 0 өмсәләрҙә .	+PxSg1+Der/са+Pl+Loc
SFX O37 0 өңсәләрҙә .	+PxSg2+Der/са+Pl+Loc
SFX O37 0 өсәләрҙә .	+PxSg3+Der/са+Pl+Loc
SFX O37 0 өбөҙсәләрҙә .	+PxPl1+Der/са+Pl+Loc
SFX O37 0 өгөҙсәләрҙә .	+PxPl2+Der/са+Pl+Loc
SFX O37 0 өмдәйҙең .	+PxSg1+Der/дай+Gen
SFX O37 0 өңдәйҙең .	+PxSg2+Der/дай+Gen
SFX O37 0 өләйҙең .	+PxSg3+Der/дай+Gen
SFX O37 0 өбөҙҙәйҙең .	+PxPl1+Der/дай+Gen
SFX O37 0 өгөҙҙәйҙең .	+PxPl2+Der/дай+Gen
SFX O37 0 өмдәйгә .	+PxSg1+Der/дай+Dat
SFX O37 0 өңдәйгә .	+PxSg2+Der/дай+Dat
SFX O37 0 өләйгә .	+PxSg3+Der/дай+Dat
SFX O37 0 өбөҙҙәйгә .	+PxPl1+Der/дай+Dat
SFX O37 0 өгөҙҙәйгә .	+PxPl2+Der/дай+Dat
SFX O37 0 өмдәйҙе .	+PxSg1+Der/дай+Acc
SFX O37 0 өңдәйҙе .	+PxSg2+Der/дай+Acc
SFX O37 0 өләйҙе .	+PxSg3+Der/дай+Acc
SFX O37 0 өбөҙҙәйҙе .	+PxPl1+Der/дай+Acc
SFX O37 0 өгөҙҙәйҙе .	+PxPl2+Der/дай+Acc
SFX O37 0 өмдәйҙән .	+PxSg1+Der/дай+Abl
SFX O37 0 өңдәйҙән .	+PxSg2+Der/дай+Abl
SFX O37 0 өләйҙән .	+PxSg3+Der/дай+Abl
SFX O37 0 өбөҙҙәйҙән .	+PxPl1+Der/дай+Abl
SFX O37 0 өгөҙҙәйҙән .	+PxPl2+Der/дай+Abl
SFX O37 0 өмдәйҙә .	+PxSg1+Der/дай+Loc
SFX O37 0 өңдәйҙә .	+PxSg2+Der/дай+Loc
SFX O37 0 өләйҙә .	+PxSg3+Der/дай+Loc
SFX O37 0 өбөҙҙәйҙә .	+PxPl1+Der/дай+Loc
SFX O37 0 өгөҙҙәйҙә .	+PxPl2+Der/дай+Loc
SFX O37 0 өмсәнең .	+PxSg1+Der/са+Gen
SFX O37 0 өңсәнең .	+PxSg2+Der/са+Gen
SFX O37 0 өсәнең .	+PxSg3+Der/са+Gen
SFX O37 0 өбөҙсәнең .	+PxPl1+Der/са+Gen
SFX O37 0 өгөҙсәнең .	+PxPl2+Der/са+Gen
SFX O37 0 өмсәгә .	+PxSg1+Der/са+Dat
SFX O37 0 өңсәгә .	+PxSg2+Der/са+Dat
SFX O37 0 өсәгә .	+PxSg3+Der/са+Dat
SFX O37 0 өбөҙсәгә .	+PxPl1+Der/са+Dat
SFX O37 0 өгөҙсәгә .	+PxPl2+Der/са+Dat
SFX O37 0 өмсәне .	+PxSg1+Der/са+Acc
SFX O37 0 өңсәне .	+PxSg2+Der/са+Acc
SFX O37 0 өсәне .	+PxSg3+Der/са+Acc
SFX O37 0 өбөҙсәне .	+PxPl1+Der/са+Acc
SFX O37 0 өгөҙсәне .	+PxPl2+Der/са+Acc
SFX O37 0 өмсәнән .	+PxSg1+Der/са+Abl
SFX O37 0 өңсәнән .	+PxSg2+Der/са+Abl
SFX O37 0 өсәнән .	+PxSg3+Der/са+Abl
SFX O37 0 өбөҙсәнән .	+PxPl1+Der/са+Abl
SFX O37 0 өгөҙсәнән .	+PxPl2+Der/са+Abl
SFX O37 0 өмсәлә .	+PxSg1+Der/са+Loc
SFX O37 0 өңсәлә .	+PxSg2+Der/са+Loc
SFX O37 0 өсәлә .	+PxSg3+Der/са+Loc
SFX O37 0 өбөҙсәлә .	+PxPl1+Der/са+Loc
SFX O37 0 өгөҙсәлә .	+PxPl2+Der/са+Loc
SFX O37 0 өмдәйме .	+PxSg1+Der/дай+Q
SFX O37 0 өңдәйме .	+PxSg2+Der/дай+Q
SFX O37 0 өләйме .	+PxSg3+Der/дай+Q
SFX O37 0 өбөҙҙәйме .	+PxPl1+Der/дай+Q
SFX O37 0 өгөҙҙәйме .	+PxPl2+Der/дай+Q
SFX O37 0 өмсәме .	+PxSg1+Der/са+Q
SFX O37 0 өңсәме .	+PxSg2+Der/са+Q
SFX O37 0 өсәме .	+PxSg3+Der/са+Q
SFX O37 0 өбөҙсәме .	+PxPl1+Der/са+Q
SFX O37 0 өгөҙсәме .	+PxPl2+Der/са+Q
SFX O37 0 өмдәйҙер .	+PxSg1+Der/дай+Indf
SFX O37 0 өңдәйҙер .	+PxSg2+Der/дай+Indf
SFX O37 0 өләйҙер .	+PxSg3+Der/дай+Indf
SFX O37 0 өбөҙҙәйҙер .	+PxPl1+Der/дай+Indf
SFX O37 0 өгөҙҙәйҙер .	+PxPl2+Der/дай+Indf
SFX O37 0 өмсәлер .	+PxSg1+Der/са+Indf
SFX O37 0 өңсәлер .	+PxSg2+Der/са+Indf
SFX O37 0 өсәлер .	+PxSg3+Der/са+Indf
SFX O37 0 өбөҙсәлер .	+PxPl1+Der/са+Indf
SFX O37 0 өгөҙсәлер .	+PxPl2+Der/са+Indf
SFX O37 0 өмдәйсе .	+PxSg1+Der/дай+Clt/сы
SFX O37 0 өңдәйсе .	+PxSg2+Der/дай+Clt/сы
SFX O37 0 өләйсе .	+PxSg3+Der/дай+Clt/сы
SFX O37 0 өбөҙҙәйсе .	+PxPl1+Der/дай+Clt/сы
SFX O37 0 өгөҙҙәйсе .	+PxPl2+Der/дай+Clt/сы
SFX O37 0 өмсәсе .	+PxSg1+Der/са+Clt/сы
SFX O37 0 өңсәсе .	+PxSg2+Der/са+Clt/сы
SFX O37 0 өсәсе .	+PxSg3+Der/са+Clt/сы
SFX O37 0 өбөҙсәсе .	+PxPl1+Der/са+Clt/сы
SFX O37 0 өгөҙсәсе .	+PxPl2+Der/са+Clt/сы
SFX O37 0 өмдәге .	+PxSg1+Der/дағы
SFX O37 0 өңдәге .	+PxSg2+Der/дағы
SFX O37 0 өндәге .	+PxSg3+Der/дағы
SFX O37 0 өбөҙҙәге .	+PxPl1+Der/дағы
SFX O37 0 өгөҙҙәге .	+PxPl2+Der/дағы
SFX O37 0 өмдәгеләр .	+PxSg1+Der/дағы+Pl
SFX O37 0 өңдәгеләр .	+PxSg2+Der/дағы+Pl
SFX O37 0 өндәгеләр .	+PxSg3+Der/дағы+Pl
SFX O37 0 өбөҙҙәгеләр .	+PxPl1+Der/дағы+Pl
SFX O37 0 өгөҙҙәгеләр .	+PxPl2+Der/дағы+Pl
SFX O37 0 өмдәгеләрҙең .	+PxSg1+Der/дағы+Pl+Gen
SFX O37 0 өңдәгеләрҙең .	+PxSg2+Der/дағы+Pl+Gen
SFX O37 0 өндәгеләрҙең .	+PxSg3+Der/дағы+Pl+Gen
SFX O37 0 өбөҙҙәгеләрҙең .	+PxPl1+Der/дағы+Pl+Gen
SFX O37 0 өгөҙҙәгеләрҙең .	+PxPl2+Der/дағы+Pl+Gen
SFX O37 0 өмдәгеләргә .	+PxSg1+Der/дағы+Pl+Dat
SFX O37 0 өңдәгеләргә .	+PxSg2+Der/дағы+Pl+Dat
SFX O37 0 өндәгеләргә .	+PxSg3+Der/дағы+Pl+Dat
SFX O37 0 өбөҙҙәгеләргә .	+PxPl1+Der/дағы+Pl+Dat
SFX O37 0 өгөҙҙәгеләргә .	+PxPl2+Der/дағы+Pl+Dat
SFX O37 0 өмдәгеләрҙе .	+PxSg1+Der/дағы+Pl+Acc
SFX O37 0 өңдәгеләрҙе .	+PxSg2+Der/дағы+Pl+Acc
SFX O37 0 өндәгеләрҙе .	+PxSg3+Der/дағы+Pl+Acc
SFX O37 0 өбөҙҙәгеләрҙе .	+PxPl1+Der/дағы+Pl+Acc
SFX O37 0 өгөҙҙәгеләрҙе .	+PxPl2+Der/дағы+Pl+Acc
SFX O37 0 өмдәгеләрҙән .	+PxSg1+Der/дағы+Pl+Abl
SFX O37 0 өңдәгеләрҙән .	+PxSg2+Der/дағы+Pl+Abl
SFX O37 0 өндәгеләрҙән .	+PxSg3+Der/дағы+Pl+Abl
SFX O37 0 өбөҙҙәгеләрҙән .	+PxPl1+Der/дағы+Pl+Abl
SFX O37 0 өгөҙҙәгеләрҙән .	+PxPl2+Der/дағы+Pl+Abl
SFX O37 0 өмдәгеләрҙә .	+PxSg1+Der/дағы+Pl+Loc
SFX O37 0 өңдәгеләрҙә .	+PxSg2+Der/дағы+Pl+Loc
SFX O37 0 өндәгеләрҙә .	+PxSg3+Der/дағы+Pl+Loc
SFX O37 0 өбөҙҙәгеләрҙә .	+PxPl1+Der/дағы+Pl+Loc
SFX O37 0 өгөҙҙәгеләрҙә .	+PxPl2+Der/дағы+Pl+Loc
SFX O37 0 өмдәгеләрме .	+PxSg1+Der/дағы+Pl+Q
SFX O37 0 өңдәгеләрме .	+PxSg2+Der/дағы+Pl+Q
SFX O37 0 өндәгеләрме .	+PxSg3+Der/дағы+Pl+Q
SFX O37 0 өбөҙҙәгеләрме .	+PxPl1+Der/дағы+Pl+Q
SFX O37 0 өгөҙҙәгеләрме .	+PxPl2+Der/дағы+Pl+Q
SFX O37 0 өмдәгеләрҙер .	+PxSg1+Der/дағы+Pl+Indf
SFX O37 0 өңдәгеләрҙер .	+PxSg2+Der/дағы+Pl+Indf
SFX O37 0 өндәгеләрҙер .	+PxSg3+Der/дағы+Pl+Indf
SFX O37 0 өбөҙҙәгеләрҙер .	+PxPl1+Der/дағы+Pl+Indf
SFX O37 0 өгөҙҙәгеләрҙер .	+PxPl2+Der/дағы+Pl+Indf
SFX O37 0 өмдәгеләрсе .	+PxSg1+Der/дағы+Pl+Clt/сы
SFX O37 0 өңдәгеләрсе .	+PxSg2+Der/дағы+Pl+Clt/сы
SFX O37 0 өндәгеләрсе .	+PxSg3+Der/дағы+Pl+Clt/сы
SFX O37 0 өбөҙҙәгеләрсе .	+PxPl1+Der/дағы+Pl+Clt/сы
SFX O37 0 өгөҙҙәгеләрсе .	+PxPl2+Der/дағы+Pl+Clt/сы
SFX O37 0 өмдәгенең .	+PxSg1+Der/дағы+Gen
SFX O37 0 өңдәгенең .	+PxSg2+Der/дағы+Gen
SFX O37 0 өндәгенең .	+PxSg3+Der/дағы+Gen
SFX O37 0 өбөҙҙәгенең .	+PxPl1+Der/дағы+Gen
SFX O37 0 өгөҙҙәгенең .	+PxPl2+Der/дағы+Gen
SFX O37 0 өмдәгегә .	+PxSg1+Der/дағы+Dat
SFX O37 0 өңдәгегә .	+PxSg2+Der/дағы+Dat
SFX O37 0 өндәгегә .	+PxSg3+Der/дағы+Dat
SFX O37 0 өбөҙҙәгегә .	+PxPl1+Der/дағы+Dat
SFX O37 0 өгөҙҙәгегә .	+PxPl2+Der/дағы+Dat
SFX O37 0 өмдәгене .	+PxSg1+Der/дағы+Acc
SFX O37 0 өңдәгене .	+PxSg2+Der/дағы+Acc
SFX O37 0 өндәгене .	+PxSg3+Der/дағы+Acc
SFX O37 0 өбөҙҙәгене .	+PxPl1+Der/дағы+Acc
SFX O37 0 өгөҙҙәгене .	+PxPl2+Der/дағы+Acc
SFX O37 0 өмдәгенән .	+PxSg1+Der/дағы+Abl
SFX O37 0 өңдәгенән .	+PxSg2+Der/дағы+Abl
SFX O37 0 өндәгенән .	+PxSg3+Der/дағы+Abl
SFX O37 0 өбөҙҙәгенән .	+PxPl1+Der/дағы+Abl
SFX O37 0 өгөҙҙәгенән .	+PxPl2+Der/дағы+Abl
SFX O37 0 өмдәгелә .	+PxSg1+Der/дағы+Loc
SFX O37 0 өңдәгелә .	+PxSg2+Der/дағы+Loc
SFX O37 0 өндәгелә .	+PxSg3+Der/дағы+Loc
SFX O37 0 өбөҙҙәгелә .	+PxPl1+Der/дағы+Loc
SFX O37 0 өгөҙҙәгелә .	+PxPl2+Der/дағы+Loc
SFX O37 0 өмдәгенеңме .	+PxSg1+Der/дағы+Gen+Q
SFX O37 0 өңдәгенеңме .	+PxSg2+Der/дағы+Gen+Q
SFX O37 0 өндәгенеңме .	+PxSg3+Der/дағы+Gen+Q
SFX O37 0 өбөҙҙәгенеңме .	+PxPl1+Der/дағы+Gen+Q
SFX O37 0 өгөҙҙәгенеңме .	+PxPl2+Der/дағы+Gen+Q
SFX O37 0 өмдәгегәме .	+PxSg1+Der/дағы+Dat+Q
SFX O37 0 өңдәгегәме .	+PxSg2+Der/дағы+Dat+Q
SFX O37 0 өндәгегәме .	+PxSg3+Der/дағы+Dat+Q
SFX O37 0 өбөҙҙәгегәме .	+PxPl1+Der/дағы+Dat+Q
SFX O37 0 өгөҙҙәгегәме .	+PxPl2+Der/дағы+Dat+Q
SFX O37 0 өмдәгенеме .	+PxSg1+Der/дағы+Acc+Q
SFX O37 0 өңдәгенеме .	+PxSg2+Der/дағы+Acc+Q
SFX O37 0 өндәгенеме .	+PxSg3+Der/дағы+Acc+Q
SFX O37 0 өбөҙҙәгенеме .	+PxPl1+Der/дағы+Acc+Q
SFX O37 0 өгөҙҙәгенеме .	+PxPl2+Der/дағы+Acc+Q
SFX O37 0 өмдәгенәнме .	+PxSg1+Der/дағы+Abl+Q
SFX O37 0 өңдәгенәнме .	+PxSg2+Der/дағы+Abl+Q
SFX O37 0 өндәгенәнме .	+PxSg3+Der/дағы+Abl+Q
SFX O37 0 өбөҙҙәгенәнме .	+PxPl1+Der/дағы+Abl+Q
SFX O37 0 өгөҙҙәгенәнме .	+PxPl2+Der/дағы+Abl+Q
SFX O37 0 өмдәгеләме .	+PxSg1+Der/дағы+Loc+Q
SFX O37 0 өңдәгеләме .	+PxSg2+Der/дағы+Loc+Q
SFX O37 0 өндәгеләме .	+PxSg3+Der/дағы+Loc+Q
SFX O37 0 өбөҙҙәгеләме .	+PxPl1+Der/дағы+Loc+Q
SFX O37 0 өгөҙҙәгеләме .	+PxPl2+Der/дағы+Loc+Q
SFX O37 0 өмдәгенеңдер .	+PxSg1+Der/дағы+Gen+Indf
SFX O37 0 өңдәгенеңдер .	+PxSg2+Der/дағы+Gen+Indf
SFX O37 0 өндәгенеңдер .	+PxSg3+Der/дағы+Gen+Indf
SFX O37 0 өбөҙҙәгенеңдер .	+PxPl1+Der/дағы+Gen+Indf
SFX O37 0 өгөҙҙәгенеңдер .	+PxPl2+Der/дағы+Gen+Indf
SFX O37 0 өмдәгегәлер .	+PxSg1+Der/дағы+Dat+Indf
SFX O37 0 өңдәгегәлер .	+PxSg2+Der/дағы+Dat+Indf
SFX O37 0 өндәгегәлер .	+PxSg3+Der/дағы+Dat+Indf
SFX O37 0 өбөҙҙәгегәлер .	+PxPl1+Der/дағы+Dat+Indf
SFX O37 0 өгөҙҙәгегәлер .	+PxPl2+Der/дағы+Dat+Indf
SFX O37 0 өмдәгенелер .	+PxSg1+Der/дағы+Acc+Indf
SFX O37 0 өңдәгенелер .	+PxSg2+Der/дағы+Acc+Indf
SFX O37 0 өндәгенелер .	+PxSg3+Der/дағы+Acc+Indf
SFX O37 0 өбөҙҙәгенелер .	+PxPl1+Der/дағы+Acc+Indf
SFX O37 0 өгөҙҙәгенелер .	+PxPl2+Der/дағы+Acc+Indf
SFX O37 0 өмдәгенәндер .	+PxSg1+Der/дағы+Abl+Indf
SFX O37 0 өңдәгенәндер .	+PxSg2+Der/дағы+Abl+Indf
SFX O37 0 өндәгенәндер .	+PxSg3+Der/дағы+Abl+Indf
SFX O37 0 өбөҙҙәгенәндер .	+PxPl1+Der/дағы+Abl+Indf
SFX O37 0 өгөҙҙәгенәндер .	+PxPl2+Der/дағы+Abl+Indf
SFX O37 0 өмдәгеләлер .	+PxSg1+Der/дағы+Loc+Indf
SFX O37 0 өңдәгеләлер .	+PxSg2+Der/дағы+Loc+Indf
SFX O37 0 өндәгеләлер .	+PxSg3+Der/дағы+Loc+Indf
SFX O37 0 өбөҙҙәгеләлер .	+PxPl1+Der/дағы+Loc+Indf
SFX O37 0 өгөҙҙәгеләлер .	+PxPl2+Der/дағы+Loc+Indf
SFX O37 0 өмдәгенеңсе .	+PxSg1+Der/дағы+Gen+Clt/сы
SFX O37 0 өңдәгенеңсе .	+PxSg2+Der/дағы+Gen+Clt/сы
SFX O37 0 өндәгенеңсе .	+PxSg3+Der/дағы+Gen+Clt/сы
SFX O37 0 өбөҙҙәгенеңсе .	+PxPl1+Der/дағы+Gen+Clt/сы
SFX O37 0 өгөҙҙәгенеңсе .	+PxPl2+Der/дағы+Gen+Clt/сы
SFX O37 0 өмдәгегәсе .	+PxSg1+Der/дағы+Dat+Clt/сы
SFX O37 0 өңдәгегәсе .	+PxSg2+Der/дағы+Dat+Clt/сы
SFX O37 0 өндәгегәсе .	+PxSg3+Der/дағы+Dat+Clt/сы
SFX O37 0 өбөҙҙәгегәсе .	+PxPl1+Der/дағы+Dat+Clt/сы
SFX O37 0 өгөҙҙәгегәсе .	+PxPl2+Der/дағы+Dat+Clt/сы
